Wisconsin, session 2025, SB366.
do enact as follows:SB366,11Section 1. 106.275 (1) (b) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB366,2,32106.275 (1) (b) An applicant that is awarded a grant under this section may 3use grant moneys awarded for any of the following:SB366,2,641. The construction, renovation, or improvement of school district facilities for 5the purpose of training students in construction-related and advanced 6manufacturing fields.SB366,2,872. The acquisition of tools and equipment that are used in construction-8related and advanced manufacturing fields.SB366,2,1193. The acquisition of software, related materials, and instructional training 10necessary for instructors and pupils to operate tools and equipment that are used in 11construction-related and advanced manufacturing fields.SB366,212Section 2. 106.275 (1) (c) (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 106.275 (1) (c) 13and amended to read:SB366,2,1814106.275 (1) (c) As a condition of receiving a grant under this section, a grant 15recipient shall provide matching funds shall be provided, which may be in the form 16of money or the monetary value of equipment software, tools, equipment, or other 17in-kind contributions. The matching funds must be in an amount equal to the 18following: or greater than any grant moneys received.SB366,31Section 3. 106.275 (1) (c) 1. and 2. of the statutes are repealed.SB366,3,22